Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1022.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1026(b) and (c) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1026. Refusal to Issue License; Revocation; Notice.--* * *(b) The department shall refuse to issue a license [or], shall revoke a license, shall impose penalties or shall mandate corrective actions for any of the following reasons:(1) Violation of or non-compliance with the provisions of this act or of regulations pursuant thereto;(2) Fraud or deceit in obtaining or attempting to obtain a 12345678910111213141516171819 license;(3) Lending, borrowing or using the license of another, or in any way knowingly aiding or abetting the improper granting of a license;(4) Gross incompetence, negligence or misconduct in operating the facility;(5) Mistreating or abusing individuals cared for in the facility[.];(6) More than three violations of a child's specific rights as enumerated in 55 Pa. Code § 3800.32 (relating to specific rights);(7) A violation on the use of restraints as enumerated in 55 Pa. Code § 3800.202 (relating to appropriate use of restrictive procedures) ; (8) A violation of the staff hiring, training and supervising requirements under 55 Pa. Code § 3800.51 (relating to child abuse and criminal history checks), 3800.52 (relating to staff hiring, retention and utilization), 3800.53 (relating to director), 3800.54 (relating to child care supervisor), 3800.55 (relating to child care worker), 3800.56 (relating to exceptions for staff qualifications), 3800.57 (relating to supervision) or 3800.58 (relating to staff training); or(9) A violation of the requirement to provide a Department of Education-approved school program or an educational program under contract with a local public school district in accordance with 55 Pa. Code § 3800.229 (relating to education).(b.1) In addition to refusing to issue a license or revoking a license, penalties and corrective actions may include imposing fines on a facility or mandating disciplinary procedures against a staff member responsible for a violation.20250HB1022PN1102 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Whenever the department revokes or refuses to issue a license, imposes penalties or mandates corrective actions, it shall give written notice thereof by certified mail. Such notice shall specify the reason for the refusal or revocation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1022PN1102 - 3 - 12345